
http://sciencenordic.com/archaeologists-and-historians-clash-geneticists-over-viking-study
	Archaeologists and historians clash with geneticists over Viking study

	Geneticists and biologists are increasingly involved in historical research. But as the new boys on the block, collaborations do not always run smoothly.

	A large DNA study has received criticism from archaeologists who think that geneticists have gotten the wrong end of the stick and misunderstood the Viking occupation of England.

	The story is just the latest in a series of examples demonstrating how archaeologists, historians, and geneticists are far from in agreement on how the past should be interpreted and described.

	“The debate on the Vikings in England sets a trend that is often debated among archaeologists—that geneticists don’t have all the necessary knowledge of the historical sources,” says Søren Sindbæk, archaeologist and professor with special responsibilities in the School of Culture and Society from Aarhus University, Denmark.
	A newcomer to writing history

	Archaeologists and historians have traditionally documented our history, but in recent decades, DNA has entered the field as an entirely new form of historical evidence.

	...“Archaeologists can feel threatened”

	The controversies between archaeologists, historians, and geneticists in-part stems from DNA scientists who do not always understand the historical context or overlook important historical details, says Professor Rasmus Nielsen from the Center for Theoretical Evolutionary Genomics at the University of California, Berkeley, USA.

	“But the debate is also a result of archaeologists who feel threatened by a new form of historical data that they don’t control,” says Nielsen.

	Professor and director of The Wellcome Trust Centre for Human Genetics at the University of Oxford, Peter Donnelly, points out that DNA research can provide new information and a different view of history.

	“Archaeology often tells us about the rich in society--jewellery and many other artefacts tell us about society's elite. There is a famous saying that history is written by the victors. But genetic material does not distinguish between rich and poor or winners and losers,” says Donnelly.

	“Therefore, DNA studies contribute new pages to our written history, but it’s obviously very important that we work together with archaeologists and historians,” says Donnelly, who co-authored a large DNA study to map historical migrations to the UK using modern DNA—one being the Danish Viking invasions from the 9th to the 11th century.


big problem in history is that some chroniclers had an agenda, and the more evidence you get the better you can tease out what that was and compare to other data


	...Physics is already integrated

	Sindbæk points out that there’s a long history of other scientists hopping a board the archaeology train: physicists, chemists, and other natural scientists were involved long before geneticists and biologists came along, he says.

	For example, physicists had already begun to revolutionise archaeology in the 1950s with the use of radioactive carbon-14 to date archaeological remains.

	“[These years represent] the third revolution of natural sciences in archaeology. Biological methods proved particularly popular. [These] new methods [could] investigate at a molecular level, be that antiquities, or remains of animals or people,” says Sindbæk.

	“Things that previously were [considered] just dead material are suddenly an enormous source of knowledge about the past, and that has certainly helped archaeology. DNA research is just one aspect of this exciting archaeological revolution. We can suddenly get information about the past by studying living human genomes,” he says.


remember reading some attacking carbon-dating as innacurate too, particularly from creationists (example: http://www.cs.unc.edu/~plaisted/ce/dating2.html)

like this article:

https://www.nytimes.com/1990/05/31/us/errors-are-feared-in-carbon-dating.html
	Archives | 1990

	ERRORS ARE FEARED IN CARBON DATING

	By MALCOLM W. BROWNE

	Since 1947, scientists have reckoned the ages of many old objects by measuring the amounts of radioactive carbon they contain. New research shows, however, that some estimates based on carbon may have erred by thousands of years.

	It is too soon to know whether the discovery will seriously upset the estimated dates of events like the arrival of human beings in the Western Hemisphere, scientists said. But it is already clear that the carbon method of dating will have to be recalibrated and corrected in some cases.

	Scientists at the Lamont-Doherty Geological Laboratory of Columbia University at Palisades, N.Y., reported today in the British journal Nature that some estimates of age based on carbon analyses were wrong by as much as 3,500 years. They arrived at this conclusion by comparing age estimates obtained using two different methods - analysis of radioactive carbon in a sample and determination of the ratio of uranium to thorium in the sample. In some cases, the latter ratio appears to be a much more accurate gauge of age than the customary method of carbon dating, the scientists said.

	...Dating Subject to Error

	But scientists have long recognized that carbon dating is subject to error because of a variety of factors, including contamination by outside sources of carbon. Therefore they have sought ways to calibrate and correct the carbon dating method. The best gauge they have found is dendrochronology: the measurement of age by tree rings.

	Accurate tree ring records of age are available for a period extending 9,000 years into the past. But the tree ring record goes no further, so scientists have sought other indicators of age against which carbon dates can be compared. One such indicator is the uranium-thorium dating method used by the Lamont-Doherty group.

	Uranium 234, a radioactive element present in the environment, slowly decays to form thorium 230. Using a mass spectrometer, an instrument that accelerates streams of atoms and uses magnets to sort them out according to mass and electric charge, the group has learned to measure the ratio of uranium to thorium very precisely.

	The Lamont-Doherty scientists conducted their analyses on samples of coral drilled from a reef off the island of Barbados. The samples represented animals that lived at various times during the last 30,000 years.

	Uranium-Thorium Dating

	Dr. Alan Zindler, a professor of geology at Columbia University who is a member of the Lamont-Doherty research group, said age estimates using the carbon dating and uranium-thorium dating differed only slightly for the period from 9,000 years ago to the present. ''But at earlier times, the carbon dates were substantially younger than the dates we estimated by uranium-thorium analysis,'' he said. ''The largest deviation, 3,500 years, was obtained for samples that are about 20,000 years old.''

	One reason the group believes the uranium-thorium estimates to be more accurate than carbon dating is that they produce better matches between known changes in the Earth's orbit and changes in global glaciation.

	According to carbon dating of fossil animals and plants, the spreading and receding of great ice sheets lagged behind orbital changes by several thousand years, a delay that scientists found hard to explain. But Dr. Richard G. Fairbanks, a member of the Lamont-Doherty group, said that if the dates of glaciation were determined using the uranium-thorium method, the delay - and the puzzle - disappeared.

	The group theorizes that large errors in carbon dating result from fluctuations in the amount of carbon 14 in the air. Changes in the Earth's magnetic field would change the deflection of cosmic-ray particles streaming toward the Earth from the Sun. Carbon 14 is thought to be mainly a product of bombardment of the atmosphere by cosmic rays, so cosmic ray intensity would affect the amount of carbon 14 in the environment at any given time. #30,000-Year Limit The Lamont-Doherty group says uranium-thorium dating not only is more precise than carbon dating in some cases, but also can be used to date much older objects. Carbon dating is unreliable for objects older than about 30,000 years, but uranium-thorium dating may be possible for objects up to half a million years old, Dr. Zindler said. The method is less suitable, however, for land animals and plants than for marine organisms, because uranium is plentiful in sea water but less so in most soils.

	But even if the method is limited to marine organisms, it will be extremely useful for deciphering the history of Earth's climate, ice, oceans and rocks, Dr. Fairbanks said.


paper cited:

http://doc.rero.ch/record/210333/files/PAL_E4371.pdf
	Calibration of the 14C timescale over the past 30,000 years using mass spectrometric U-Th ages from Barbados corals

	Edouard Bard, Bruno Hamelin, Richard G. Fairbanks & Alan Zindler

	Uranium-thorium ages obtained by mass spectrometry from corals raised off the sialnds of Barados confirm the high precision of this technique over at least the past 30,000 years. Comparison of the U-Th ages with 14C ages obtained on the Holocene samples shows that the U-Th ages are accurate, because they accord with the dendrochronological calibration. Before 9,000 yr BP the 14C ages are systematically younger than the U-Th ages, with a maximum differences of ~3,500 yr at ~20,000 yr BP. The U-Th technique thus provides a way of calibrating the radiocarbon timescale beyond the range of dendrochronological calibration.

	...Recently 234U-239Th dating of corals by thermal ionization mass spectrometry (TIMS) has been demonstrated to be significantly more precise and accurate than the [alpha]-counting method. It has been predicted that U-Th dating would be even more precise than the 14C in the time range of the last deglaciation (6-20 kyr). We have implemented this technique at the Lamont-Doherty Geological Observatory and measured TH and 14C ages in the same coral samples to enable comparison of the two geochrometers. Here we focus on the U-TH/14C comparsison for the past 30,000 years.

	...The most striking result is that the Th ages are consistently older than the 14C ages, with a maximum difference of ~3.5 kyr at ~20 Th kyr BP (Fib. 2). The difference between the two chronometers is equivalent to a [Delta]14C of ~400-500% above the present-day reference level for ages between 18 and 22 kyr BP.


graph shows in agreement until 9,000 years ago then veers off linearly until off by 3,500 yr at 20,000 years ago


	...Before the Holocene, we cannot yet demonstrate that our U-Th ages are true 'calendar' ages, but we will argue that this is a reasonable assumption.


Holocene beginning of current geological epoch about 11k years ago

in their data carbon dating disagreed with Th by a few hundred years at that point

goes on about looking at what could have caused the discrepency where their results imply 400-500% more C14 20,000 years ago. This was where the C14 and Uranium-Thorium results were off by 3,500 years

considered contamination of the samples, "diagenetic alteration or uranium exchange", uranium loss


	...A definitive test of the accuracy of the 14C ages used in this comparison will be to replicate all of the measurements by AMS.

	The good quality of the corals for U-Th was tested by X-ray diffraction which showed that no secondary calcite was detectable in the corals. This is important, but not sufficient, to rule out any diagenetic alteration or uranium exchange. The strongest argument for the quality of the samples comes from the U-Th measurements themselves: all the initial 234U/238U ratios fall in the range of the modern sea water (activity ration between 1.14 and 1.1.5, ref. 21) in contrast with older air-exposed samples


says definite test will be to replicate measurements, spends rest of the paper on explanation of discrepancy with carbon cycle changes or changes in C14 production


	...Carbon cycle changes

	The 14C-age calculation relies on the assumption that the atmospheric 14C/C ratio has not changed with time and therefore can be used to normalize the measured ration in fossil carbon. Unfortunately, the atmosphere contains less than a ton of 14C and most of the radiocarbon is in the ocean (> 40 tons). Subtle changes in the reservoir sizes and/or rates of exchange between reservoirs could have significantly affected the 14C content of the atmosphere. CO2 measurements in old polar ice showed that the atmospheric concentration was lower during the last glacial than during the Holocene.


Need to know ration of isotope 14C and C to calculate carbon date, not that much 14 c in the atmosphere, and found that it was lower during glacial period, and can be different for ocean and atmosphere


	...A model calculation similar to that of Oeschger et al. shows that the difference in 14C between the surface and the deep sea would have to be increased by ~3.5 kyr to account for a 400% higher atmospheric 14C/C. This age difference is not supported by the palaeoceanographic data on benthic-planktonic pairs of foraminifera dated by 14C AMS. These studies have shown that the ventilation age difference was higher in the Pacific by ~500+/-100 yr (refs 43, 44) and in the Atlantic by 200 +/- 200 yr (ref. 44). Assuming that the highest values measured in the Pacific are valid for the global ocean would lead to a maximal atmospheric 14C/C ratio increase of ~70%.

	In summary, changes in the carbon cycle can account for only ~100-150% increase in the [delta]14C of the atmopshere as compared to the 400-500% inferred from the Barbados data.


says theres a problem that carbon-cycle data doesn't account for the 400-500% C14 difference

	
	Changes in the 14C production

	The mean 14C/C ration of the exchangeable carbon on the Earth is maintained by a steady state between production by cosmic rays in the upper atmosphere and radiodecay. The 14C of the atmosphere can therefore undergo variations in response to changes in the flux of galactic protons, solar-wind magnetic properties or the dipole moment of the Earth.

	Little is known about possible variations of the cosmic rays on the timescale of interest. As discussed below, the main [Delta]14C variations during the Holocene can be explained by changes of the magnetic field and/or changes in the ocean circulation. Therefore it is not necessary to call for a modulatino of the galactic protons, and this flux can be assumed to be constant with time until data is produced to the contrary.

	Changes in the solar-wind modulation are also poorly known...

	...We assumed no error on the 14C production algorithm and constant errors of 5 and 10% of the present-day magnetic field on the palaeomagnetic record. There is clear agreement between the [delta]14C data calculated from the U-TH/14C comparison and our calcuation based on the palaeomagnetic record. The [delta]14C values around 18-22 kyr BP are, however, higher on average than the paleomagnetism reconstruction, which may indicate that ~100% of the signal is the result of reservoir changes associated with the last glacial maximum.

	It must be mentioned that some of the palaeomagnetism data compiled by McElhinny and Senanayake were dated by 14C. Using our calibration (Fib. 2) to correct the timescale would only stretch the predicted [delta]14C curve by a few kyr. The U-Th/14C would still be well within the errors of the geomagnetic reconstruction of the [delta]14C curve. Therefore the most reasonable explanation for the large difference between the 14C and U-Th ages involves magnetic modulation of the atmosphere 14C production rate.


after ruling out everything else, figure change in magnetic field is the most reasonable explanation for the discrepency


	Discussion

	We have shown here that by using U-Th mass spectrometry one can achieve an age precision and reproducibility comparable to or even better than that obtained by the radiocarbon geochronicological method. U-Th ages measured in corals drilled off the shore of Barbados indicate that the 14C timescale is significantly compressed during the late glacial interval These results can be explained mainly as the consequences of chances in the cosmogenic nuclide production linked to the gradual decrease of the Earth's magnetic field. Changes in the carbon cycle can account for ~10-20% of the age discrepency observed between the two geochronometers. It should be borne in mind that the accuracy of the U-Th ages is proven only back to 10,000 years; nevertheless, all geophysical information available (dendrochronology, varve dating and paleomagnetism) suggests that our U-Th results are reasonable and that they may be used as a first-order tool to calibrate the radiocarbon timescale beyond the range of the high-resolution dendrochonological comparison.


paper concluded their Uranium-Thorim dating data was only proven back 10,000 years, during which the C14 and Uranium-Thorim data agreed. Data implied a huge discrepency in C14 20,000 years ago which they spent most of the paper discussing. After a back-of-the-hand calculation concluded changes in the earth's magnetic field was the most reasonable explanation for the discrepency.


NY Times headline: "ERRORS ARE FEARED IN CARBON DATING"

"it is already clear that the carbon method of dating will have to be recalibrated and corrected in some cases."

"some estimates of age based on carbon analyses were wrong by as much as 3,500 years."


Author Malcolm Browne was the guy who took the famous picture of the monk who set himself on fire in protest of Deim's government: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Malcolm_Browne went on to be a science writer


maybe he wasn't a very good one...


William Booth of Washington Post reported on the research similarly in shorter article:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/06/04/archaeology-resetting-carbon-14-clock/a133c430-0b4d-4475-87dd-7a039cd3a741/
	ARCHAEOLOGY RESETTING CARBON-14 CLOCK

	By William Booth June 4, 1990

	Researchers using new techniques reported last week that the method most widely used to date prehistoric artifacts and fossils is inaccurate by thousands of years, meaning that many key dates for events such as ice ages and human migrations may have to be adjusted.

	Columbia University scientists say in the current issue of the journal Nature that the popular method of dating materials using ratios of radioactive carbon-14 gives dates that are up to 3,500 years too young. In other words, the "carbon-14 clock" has been running fast.

	The researchers drilled into an ancient coral reef off the coast of Barbados and then compared dates produced by the traditional carbon-14 technique and a more sophisticated technique based on the ratios of radioactive uranium and thorium. Carbon-14 dating consistently gave younger ages from about 8,000 to 30,000 before the present.

	Based on the new dating system, the peak of the last ice age is now thought to be 21,500 years ago, not 18,000 as figured by carbon-14 dating. Many archaeologists may also need to fiddle with their dates, though the more important question of sequence -- of what happened first -- will not be altered.



paper was published in May 31 1990: https://www.nature.com/articles/345405a0

Booth says this was from the researches in the week before June 4, 1990, so referring to the paper or a statement by them

paper doesn't say anything about "time to adjust key dates" and its unusual even for Washington Post to flat out lie

second paragraph referring directly to the paper is a lie


Booth was arrested by Israeli police I guess for falling for some kind of trap where they wanted to pay protestors to take pictures of them inciting unrest:


https://www.timesofisrael.com/washington-post-reporter-briefly-detained-in-jerusalem-for-incitement/
	Police briefly detain Washington Post reporter for ‘incitement’

	Border policemen question William Booth outside Jerusalem's Damascus Gate after woman reportedly offers to provoke a demonstration; government calls move 'unnecessary'

	By JUDAH ARI GROSS

	Washington Post Jerusalem bureau chief William Booth and a colleague were briefly detained by Israeli police Tuesday outside Jerusalem’s Old City, in what what the government called the “the result of an unfortunate misunderstanding.”

	Booth, along with journalist Sufian Taha and reporter Ruth Marks Eglash, had been planning to interview locals near the Damascus Gate next to the Old City of Jerusalem, which has been the site of several attempted attacks in the last three days.

	...An Arab woman allegedly told Booth that if he paid some of the bystanders, they would provoke the nearby police officers and start a violent demonstration, Jerusalem Police spokesperson Asi Aharoni told The Times of Israel.

	“Police officers were told that she said if you pay these youngsters, they will start the provocation and you’ll be able to take pictures,” Aharoni said.

	...Speaking in Berlin, Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu said Israel was committed to a free press.

	“We do not arrest journalists. The press in Israel is very energetic and free to say anything it wants,” he said during a press conference with German Chancellor Angela Merkel.


gov apologized for it and said nothing was going on

NY Times article on it short on details: https://www.nytimes.com/2016/02/17/world/middleeast/washington-post-reporter-william-booth-detained-by-israel.html

background:

http://www.jpost.com/Arab-Israeli-Conflict/Initial-report-Suspected-stabbing-of-2-Israelis-in-Old-City-Damascus-Gate-445474
	OFFICERS THWART TWO ATTACKS AT DAMASCUS GATE

	IDF to demolish homes of two teenage terrorists from Sha’ar Binyamin Rami Levy attack

	BY DANIEL K. EISENBUD, KHALED ABU TOAMEH, YAAKOV LAPPIN  FEBRUARY 19, 2016 09:20

	Two Border Police officers were wounded in a stabbing attack outside the Old City’s Damascus Gate on Friday morning carried out by a Palestinian man who was shot dead at the scene.

	It was one of four violent incidents that occurred in the West Bank and east Jerusalem over the weekend, two of which occurred at the Damascus Gate.

	On Saturday evening, at approximately 6 p.m., Border Police stationed at the Damascus Gate identified a suspicious-looking 18-yearold Arab male who pulled a knife when he was asked to show identification, police said. Aided by a police canine, the officers were able to quickly disarm and subdue the suspect without sustaining any injuries.

	In the Friday incident, Muhammad Muhammad Abu Khalif, 20, attacked the two officers from behind at approximately 9 a.m.

	...Police said heightened security remains in effect in and around the Old City, with an emphasis on Damascus Gate, which has been the site of a series of deadly attacks carried out by Palestinian men, women and teenagers of both sexes since the terrorism wave engulfed the capital in October.

	...Border Police and IDF soldiers were dispersing a disturbance at the scene, when the ramming attack occurred. The attacker’s car plowed into a Border Police jeep after he was shot.

	Some 3,000 Palestinians attended Hamed’s funeral later in the day, chanting slogans calling for revenge and praising him as a “hero” and martyr.”


there were multiple attacks over a few days on police officers and it caused unrest

looks there their have been a lot of attacks on police officers at Damascus gate:


https://www.timesofisrael.com/probe-into-deadly-damascus-gate-attack-said-to-fault-officers/

https://www.reuters.com/article/us-israel-palestinians-violence/three-palestinians-shot-dead-after-killing-israeli-officer-idUSKBN1972J3


in Feb 2016, there were 4 attacks as of Feb 19, two of which occured at damascus gate over weekend of 14-15th and one on morning of 19th. Booth was arrested on the 16th so this was in the middle of the attacks.

police had a statement:

https://www.haaretz.com/israel-news/jerusalem-police-briefly-detain-washington-post-reporter-1.5405234
	Jerusalem Police issued a statement saying that a "passerby had complained that he was witness to the intention on the part of a number of people to stage a provocative situation and a disturbance of the peace by young Arabs directed at police." The incident was apparently to be staged for "propaganda purposes," the police added.

	"In light of the complaint, the police detained a number of suspects to clarify the facts – in a sensitive and discreet manner at the adjacent police facility. When the circumstances of the incident became clear, and no suspicion of criminal activity was found, the detainees were immediately released by the investigating officer without proceedings of any kind in the matter."

	...Israel Police later released another statement, apologizing for any emotional harm caused to the journalists, saying that an investigation of the incident showed that the detainment was necessary in light of the information that had been received, which later turned out to have been false.  


booth later reported on the violence at Damascus Gate:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/middle_east/jerusalems-ancient-damascus-gate-is-at-the-heart-of-a-modern-wave-of-violence/2016/02/16/a3da07f8-d42a-11e5-a65b-587e721fb231_story.html
	Jerusalem’s ancient Damascus Gate is at the heart of a modern wave of violence
	By William Booth and Ruth Eglash

	Asked why Palestinians chose the Damascus Gate as a site for attacks, the teen said, “Because this is where the police harass and humiliate the girls and the boys.”

	That is reason to grab a knife?

	“For some,” Afaneh said.

	Oct. 4, when Palestinian teen Fadi ­Alloun was accused by nearby Israelis of attempting to attack them. The crowd chased Alloun into the central square, where he was shot by Israeli police officers who had responded to a call. Palestinians say Alloun was lynched. Israeli police said he had a knife. Since then, at least 11 Palestinians have been killed at the gate or at the nearby tram stop.

	...The high level of security extended even to journalists. On Tuesday, while conducting interviews at the Damascus Gate, Washington Post bureau chief William Booth and correspondent Sufian Taha were briefly detained by police on suspicion of causing incitement. The police later issued an apology, saying the suspicions were “without foundation.”

	...Hatem Ganam, 57, sells duffel bags and backpacks at a shop just inside the Damascus Gate. “All the tension, all the pressure, is concentrated right here. All the insults, humiliations, searches. All here. It is a terrifying atmosphere, I promise you.”

	“Damascus Gate is our gate,” the Palestinian merchant said. “The more the Israelis pull, the tighter we hold on.”

	Sufian Taha contributed to this report.


also reported this:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/palestinian-journalist-jailed-without-charge-by-israel-has-not-eaten-for-three-months/2016/02/18/48b007a8-d59a-11e5-a65b-587e721fb231_story.html
	Palestinian journalist detained without charge by Israel has not eaten for three months

	By William Booth February 18, 2016

	RAMALLAH, West Bank — “They’ve kidnapped my husband,” said the wife of Mohammed al-Qeq, a Palestinian journalist who has been on a hunger strike in an Israeli hospital for three months.

	“He is dying,” she said.

	Qeq, a reporter for a Saudi TV network, was arrested by Israeli security forces in November at his home in Ramallah and taken to an Israeli prison, where he was placed under “administrative detention,” a tool employed by Israeli military courts to hold Palestinian suspects without charges.

	Such detainees, arrested in the occupied West Bank and assumed to pose an immediate danger to the state, can be jailed indefinitely.


looks bad for israeli police

maybe laying it on too thick--police were just murdered, later reported blamed israli police for the attacks

police issued three statements on the arrest:

http://mondoweiss.net/2016/02/israel-detains-washington-post-bureau-chief-in-jerusalem-accusing-him-of-incitement/
	“A passer-by complained that he witnessed a number of people intending to stage a provocative situation and disturbances by young Arabs toward policemen responsible for security in the area, apparently for propaganda purposes. In view of the complaint, the policemen detained a number of suspects in order to clarify the facts in a sensitive and discreet manner at the nearby police facility,” said the statement from police spokesperson Luba Samri, adding Booth was  “released immediately by the investigating officer without any other steps taken in the matter.”

	Update: Israeli police have now issued a third statement in the case, stating that the original complaint was “without foundation.” 

	...“Regarding the detaining and questioning of a Washington Post correspondent, we would like to make it clear that following an inquiry into the circumstances of the event it has been ascertained that the information which had been given to the officers was without foundation. We regret if any distress was caused to those who were detained. The police are aware of the need for sensitivity and officers are instructed to allow journalists to do their work including in centers of friction that are especially sensitive due to the security situation, with emphasis on the public peace and the security of the journalists themselves while honoring and realizing the important value of freedom of the press.”


wapo might have done better to report the first two police statements: https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/worldviews/wp/2016/02/16/israel-briefly-detains-two-washington-post-journalists-calls-it-an-unfortunate-misunderstanding/

https://www.thewrap.com/washington-post-reporter-detained-by-israeli-authorities-in-unfortunate-misunderstanding/

http://www.dw.com/en/journalists-fume-over-arrest-of-washington-post-reporters-in-jerusalem/a-19054303


why were there three statements and how did they figure out the charges were "without foundation" so quickly?

might be worth looking at this for media back-and-forth a la Leopold and Loeb case, particularly in the context of the subsequent attacks (not subject of current inquiry, something for later)


seems most likely true that the journalists were innocent of what they were arrested for, interesting part being media reaction to the case


https://www.dailysabah.com/mideast/2016/02/16/israel-detains-washington-post-jerusalem-bureau-chief
	An Israeli Foreign Ministry spokesman, Emmanuel Nahshon, called it "a regrettable incident" and praised Booth as "an excellent journalist".


on that last point, however...


booth getting in trouble again:

https://www.poynter.org/news/report-washington-post-suspends-william-booth
	The Washington Post has suspended William Booth, Alexander C. Kaufman reports. The Post apologized earlier this week, saying Booth lifted copy from an article by a University of Southern California professor in a story he wrote about the Panama Canal.

	...Kaufman has a letter from Post Executive Editor Marty Baron to Andrea Hricko, the professor to whose work Booth helped himself. The plagiarism "represented a serious violation of our ethics standards," Baron writes.

https://www.washingtoncitypaper.com/news/city-desk/blog/13066704/washington-post-mexico-bureau-chief-admits-plagiarizing-academic-journal-in-panama-story


is Booth an idiot?

most propagandists in NY TImes and WaPo don't flat-out lie, but Booth is an exception, and so would tend to be the one to take the heat for it

to keep with theme here's a slightly creepy article by him on Bayeax tapestry:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/europe/frances-fabled-bayeux-tapestry-is-headed-to-britain-in-a-loan-for-the-ages/2018/01/18/a8827044-fb9f-11e7-9b5d-bbf0da31214d_story.html
	France’s epic Bayeux Tapestry is headed to Britain, in a loan for the ages

	By William Booth and James McAuley January 18

	LONDON — It is probably the most famous piece of medieval embroidery in the world, a ribbon of scrolling tapestry 70 yards long that tells in pictures the story of the Norman Conquest of England in 1066, an epic tale of gore, glory and God. 

	There is nothing quite like the Bayeux Tapestry, a near-cinematic work of narrative genius. French President Emmanuel Macron's announcement Thursday evening that his government will allow the priceless treasure to leave France for the first time in almost 1,000 years to be exhibited in Britain is a sensational stroke of cultural diplomacy.

	...For the British, the Bayeux Tapestry holds a powerful allure, since the Norman Conquest represented not just a tragedy and a defeat but a pivot point that essentially transformed Anglo-Saxon society into the Britain of today (and gave us the language of Shakespeare).

	...The 20-inch-high, intricately stitched work is a history and morality play — unfolding chronologically from left to right, with a couple of flashbacks — about how the heroic but flawed Harold, Earl of Wessex, briefly took the throne after the death of the heirless Edward the Confessor, only to be defeated just months into his reign by the righteous William, Duke of Normandy, at the climactic Battle of Hastings.

	As William Faulkner wrote: "'The past is never dead. It's not even past." A descendant of William the Conqueror sits on the British throne today, 91-year-old Queen Elizabeth II.

	...fans of the Bayeux embroidery were giddy at the prospect of its appearance in Britain, with various museums and their political patrons already competing to host the show.

	"This is a work that can only be spoken of in superlatives," said Andrew Bridgeford, a lawyer, historian and the author of "1066: The Hidden History of the Bayeux Tapestry." 

	...Not everyone in Britain was as thrilled about the second coming of the tapestry — not least because it chronicles a crushing defeat. John Redwood, a Conservative Party lawmaker and hard-line advocate of Britain's exit from the European Union, blasted out a volley of tweets.

	"While I'm sure the offer is well meant, I will pass over the unfortunate truth that it depicts an invading French army killing England's King & many in his army before taking over," he wrote.

	...Not only is the tapestry extraordinary, so is its mere survival: The wool yarn embroidered on linen has bested both moths and Nazis.

	During the French Revolution, the panels were to be confiscated to cover military wagons, but they were rescued by a local lawyer.

	Napoleon took the tapestry to Paris and paraded before it as he contemplated an invasion of England.

	Because of its depiction of the conquest — by the descendants of Norsemen or Vikings — the Nazis coveted the tapestry as Aryan propaganda.

	Before the Allied invasion of France in World War II, the Germans moved the tapestry to occupied Paris to safeguard it along with their other loot in the ­Louvre. The SS chief, Heinrich Himmler, wanted it to decorate his medieval castle in Germany. 

	Just hours before the Allies swept into Paris, British code-breakers intercepted a signal from Himmler ordering his troops to snatch the tapestry — but they were repelled by French resistance fighters who took up positions at the Louvre.

	...Most scholars suspect that William the Conqueror's half brother, Bishop Odo of Bayeux, commissioned the piece, although no one knows and there are other intriguing possibilities. Indeed, William's Norman lords, and the Anglo-Saxons who backed him, became landed millionaires, even billionaires, by today's standards.

	The designer's identity is also lost to history. Although Gameson said it could have been a monk, as some argue, he suspects it was someone more worldly and well traveled who was familiar with the look of contemporary ships, weapons, horse tack, architecture and court life.


Booth seems to be giddy himself about all the mysteries behind the Bayeau tapestry


	...But the tapestry suggests, too, that William won by divine right. Harold was the usurper to the throne, it appears to argue, and William the rightful heir.

	There is a literal hand of God shown here, a cross emblazoned on a Norman ship there. "The signs are subtle to us," Gameson said. But to its 11th-century audience, the message would have been clear: The right guy won.



...


more on Booth


Booth seems to have an interest an archeology:



https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/middle_east/israeli-archaeologists-rush-to-dig-at-cave-of-skulls-before-looters-take-everything/2016/06/08/7f0e0e6a-281c-11e6-8329-6104954928d2_story.html
	Israeli archaeologists rush to dig at Cave of Skulls before looters take everything


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1989/08/05/signs-of-siege-at-city-of-mysterious-maya/66c4a8a0-1214-4cd5-bcfd-46dba59f4412/
	...Demarest and a dozen colleagues from the United States and Guatemala will spend the next five years excavating seven ancient cities and testing their theories of warfare against the evidence of the Maya downfall. "We want to learn why the bubble burst," Demarest said.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/middle_east/looters-raid-jordanian-crypts-in-search-of-gold-jewels-and-artifacts/2014/10/29/67a53b46-5ac7-11e4-8264-deed989ae9a2_story.html


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/12/17/why-not-implant-life-on-mars/2a95b930-ee94-4a82-b061-3504b9fae024/
	Looters raid Jordanian crypts in search of gold, jewels and artifacts

	...“You combine unemployment and ignorance and this is what happens,” the mayor said. “In reality, there is no treasure.”

	And yet — the mayor lit a cigarette and began his own story. He has a cousin, you see. Who was digging. Just eight months ago. Who found a golden cross, he said. A big one. Very old, very valuable.

	There was a little glint in the mayor’s eye.


creepy articles:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1998/04/29/prosecutors-outline-kaczynskis-motives/3650b432-6efb-4ad7-96ef-8587fc6a56e0/
	PROSECUTORS OUTLINE KACZYNSKI'S MOTIVES

	In his own hand, convicted Unabomber Theodore J. Kaczynski wrote that he believed in nothing but "personal revenge," that he wanted to kill, not because of his love of nature, but his hatred of people, according to material released by federal prosecutors today.

	...In 1971, seven years before his first bomb, Kaczynski stated in his journal: "My motive for doing what I am going to do is simply personal revenge. I do not expect to accomplish anything by it."

	In another entry, Kaczynski wrote that he did not believe in "the cult of nature worshippers or wilderness worshippers," that "I am perfectly happy to litter in parts of the woods that are of no use to me." He, himself, tossed cans in the forests and poached game.

	He expresses little remorse in his writings, instead chiding himself for being "programmed" by society and "chickening out" when he wanted to kill. From an entry dated Sept. 15, 1980, "Guilty feelings? Yes, a little. . . . I am definitely glad to have done what I have."

	Kaczynski also did much to avoid apprehension, wearing disguises, sandpapering away fingerprints and going so far as to insert in one of his bombs a hair that he collected in a public rest room.

	Moreover, despite promising to stop sending bombs if his manifesto were published, his cabin contained the materials to make more bombs, including 40 pipes, rigged alarm clocks, 23 identical initiating devices, lists of potential victims with their home addresses and a handwritten manual entitled "How to Kill an Exxon Exec." A fully armed, powerful bomb was also found, the package ready for delivery, with a label stating it contained a tool commonly used in the aircraft industry. It lacked only an address. 



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/lifestyle/2004/05/27/turning-up-the-hype/f8e2acc2-f4b2-4c06-bebc-6e194b413e60/
	The potential summer blockbuster "The Day After Tomorrow" (opening, actually, tomorrow) is about the adventures of a little planet we call Earth that suddenly finds itself experiencing extreme meteorological distress due to humankind's prodigious discharge of greenhouse gases.

	...Directed by master of disaster Roland Emmerich (the German who blew up the White House in "Independence Day" and also did a "Godzilla" remake), the movie does for global warming what Emmerich did for space aliens and a giant lizard: make it scary (and oddly fun).



https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/scientists-try-to-save-the-frogs-as-time-runs-out/2012/12/30/3ac5ffec-48c3-11e2-8af9-9b50cb4605a7_story.html
	Scientists try to save the frogs as time runs out

	...The lab smells like a junior-high locker room where the bleach is losing. Perhaps it is all the crickets, larvae, flies — the food that is keeping the frogs alive. They are safe, at least for now, in what scientists are calling an “amphibian ark.”

	But time is running out.

	The frogs have been captives for five or six years, and frogs do not live forever.

	The caretakers hope they will be able to encourage these finicky, exotic, mysterious captives to breed, and then return their progeny — somehow, someday, somewhere — to the wild.

	It is much harder than you might think. Because the thing that is killing the frogs is still out there.

	...In the pristine tropical forests of the world, the waters still run clear and clean, and the jungle is, as ever, a riot of green, grasping life.

	But something is missing.

	Where there was once a crazy cacophony of frog song, all day, all night, there is now a spooky quiet.

	The streams have gone silent.

	The frogs are gone. And they might not be coming back, unless scientists in extinction hot spots such as Panama succeed in their audacious bid to breed the rarest of the rare in captivity in amphibian arks.

	...Maybe nature will take its course, and some frog species will make it out in the wild, and others will be lost forever.

	“The quiet is incredible,” said Jamie Voyles, a scientist at the University of California at Berkeley who was the first to understand the precise mechanism of Bd death.

	She is standing in a silent stream in Panama. “I used to collect here, take samples, and it would be please, not another frog! It’s 4 a.m. and I want to go home. Now I’m begging them. Come back.”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1989/06/05/lake-victorias-ecosystem-vital-to-millions-may-be-unraveling/90450ec8-ee20-4cc4-aa3b-ab6c6f49e27a/
	LAKE VICTORIA'S ECOSYSTEM, VITAL TO MILLIONS, MAY BE UNRAVELING

	The greatest freshwater lake in Africa, once a living aquarium filled with hundreds of species of exotic fish, may be poised on the brink of an ecological collapse that would rob millions of lakeshore people of their major source of protein. An international team of researchers has reported that Lake Victoria, the third largest lake in the world, is dominated by just three species of fish, including an introduced predator called the Nile perch. Unlike the perch familiar in American waters, the Nile perch can grow six feet long and weigh several hundred pounds. A relentless carnivore at the top of the food chain, the Nile perch has so devastated native fish species that it has resorted to feeding on its own young.

	...The deterioration of native fish stocks has overturned traditional fishing and forced the Africans to depend on the introduced perch, a fishery that is proving to be highly unstable in other lakes in Africa. "As an ecologist, it's hard for me to believe that the system can last for long," said William Cooper, a zoology professor at Michigan State University

	...The cascade of ecological consequences, which touches the lake's biggest and smallest inhabitants -- from the bacteria lurking at the bottom of the lake to the fisherman casting his net from a dugout canoe -- began with the idea among British colonists of attracting tourists through sport fishing. The huge Nile perch seemed a good candidate and in the early 1960s the British stocked Lake Victoria with Nile perch. In 20 years, the eating machine spread to every corner of the lake. As the Nile perch population exploded, it sent some 350 species of native fish into a tailspin.

	...As Nile perch spread, local fisherman began shifting their harvest from native tilapia to Nile perch. The perch is a tasty, meaty fish. Traditionally, Lake Victoria fisherman either sold their tilapia catch for that day's consumption or preserved the little fish by drying them in the sun. Nile perch are too big and too oily to dry, so they must be smoked over charcoal fires. To feed the fires, the people have cut down the surrounding forests, extending the ecological catastrophe out of the water and up to the slopes around the lake. At present, perch populations are strong. But experts fear the fish will soon deplete its prey and then its population will crash, sending the fishing industry into a bust that could, as fish stocks recover, become a cycle of booms and busts. "It's hard for us to imagine how dependent the Africans are on the lake for their daily needs," said Hecky. "Without the fish, they don't eat protein." 

	..."Perhaps it isn't a simple case of an introduced species eating up all the natives. Maybe it's more insidious than that," Kaufman said.

	...For all the pessimism, there remains some hope, according to Kaufman. During their last trip to the lake, the scientists discovered that there was a narrow layer of water just above the anaerobic zone that contained just enough oxygen for many native cichlids, but not enough to support the Nile perch. In future expeditions, the scientists hope to survey this refuge with a remote-operated submersible, and they hope to find rich concentrations of fish just out of reach of the Nile perch.



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1991/08/11/mysterious-malady-hits-sea-urchins/8b14ccb4-4e7e-4985-abba-68691e461fbd/
	MYSTERIOUS MALADY HITS SEA URCHINS

	...It is unknown whether these events are related, although warmer sea water temperatures and pollution are often mentioned as possible causes.

	...According to Bullis, infected urchins become lethargic. Their spines droop. They stop eating. Their spines rot, then fall off. They stop moving.

	"Then they waste away," Bullis said. Inside the urchins, their once "very beautiful and brightly colored organs" turn into brown mush. Bullis said it is not a pleasant way for any creature to go, even an urchin.

	Urchin populations first crashed throughout the western North Atlantic and Caribbean Sea in 1983 and 1984, marking the largest and most devastating die-off ever witnessed for a marine invertebrate. On many reefs, 95 percent of the urchins perished. There was another die-off last year.

	..."There used to be tons of urchins. Now you never see them," said David Forcucci, an urchin researcher at the Keys Marine Laboratory on Long Key. "It's quite a puzzle."

	...Are the deaths of the urchins a symptom of larger problems? Researchers are not sure. Earlier, they suspected that warm water temperatures might be contributing to the die-off, but the current deaths began in the spring, when water temperatures are lower. Pollution, and the general degradation of inshore waters, also could be contributing to the deaths.

	..."The commonly expressed belief is that the reefs are not doing very well. There is cause for alarm, I think, but until we do better monitoring, we won't know."


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/02/09/fire-threatens-nearly-extinct-monkeys/10ee7885-1267-4fd6-8fd5-c16a624ff64c/
	FIRE THREATENS NEARLY EXTINCT MONKEYS

	...The fire, which has consumed almost half of the forest preserve where the monkeys are located, has been burning since Saturday, according to Beck. Some 300 firefighters have been flown onto the site from Rio de Janeiro, 60 miles to the south, but extremely high winds and dry conditions have foiled efforts to bring the fire under control. Beck said it was not known how the fire started. The 12,000-acre Poco das Antas biological reserve is one of the last remnants of the once-vast forests that covered the Atlantic coast of Brazil.

	The fire, which Beck described as "a complete disaster," illustrates the difficulty of reintroducing endangered animals into small habitats, where a single event -- such as a fire, oil spill, or outbreak of disease -- can destroy an entire population of animals.

	...At the National Zoo, the tamarins lived uncaged and were free to swing on ropes and vines and to forage for food in a glade set aside for them. To keep the monkeys from escaping, they wore radio collars, which would alert their handlers of any escape attempts.

	Another group was scheduled to be trained this spring, but the fire has put those plans in jeopardy.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1991/08/26/choleras-mysterious-journey-north/2f37b21d-1d1e-464e-a3fe-d7c32067f397/


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1996/02/18/buchanan-plugs-in-to-voters-anxieties/93532e30-a994-42c0-86a5-60a16a3ea550/
	BUCHANAN PLUGS IN TO VOTERS' ANXIETIES

	Alan Horlick remembers a time long ago, when he engineered rocket ships and computer chips for big paternal corporations, when the money was good but the quality of life even better, and in those days, he remembers, America was awesome in its power.

	Horlick now feels the fear. He smells it. "The creeping crud," he calls it. A nation sold out by New World internationalists and Washington insiders, under siege from within and without, invaded not only by drugs and aliens, but cheap tomatoes picked by Mexican serfs and underwear sewn by Chinese prisoners. He sees lazy welfare queens and crazed baby killers and, before the end of the millennium, the collapse of America.

	Alan Horlick, a retired engineer from Londonderry, supports Patrick J. Buchanan.

	And so, too, do a lot of often angry or fearful citizens here, perhaps enough to give Buchanan the state in Tuesday's first-in-the-nation presidential primary.

	...Added to this is Buchanan's second punch. My friends, he bellows, not only are times tough, but you're being sold out by deal-makers in Washington, stock traders on Wall Street and heartless little men with green eye shades in the corporate towers.

	It is high voltage, and Buchanan, a skillful orator before crowds and the camera's eye, has gotten his hands on the switch. "What are they doing to us?" Buchanan boomed at a Christian Coalition rally in Manchester Friday night. They. The other. The United Nations. The World Trade Organization. Puppet masters pulling strings in Brussels.

	...Many voters in New Hampshire say they "support" Dole or "prefer" Alexander. Buchanan's people say they "believe" in him.

	..."When he speaks to you, you don't feel like he's just read a poll," Carol Bingham, a mother of three, said at the Christian Coalition rally. She said she appreciated Buchanan's ideas about erecting fences on the Mexican border but mostly liked his zealous opposition to abortion. "I voted for him in 1992 and he's saying the same things now he said then," she said. "He's consistent."

	...He talked about "the innocent unborn" and "the silent screams," an unmistakable allusion to the videos of the same name that show graphic images of aborted, late-term fetuses.

	Afterward, Margaret Weaver, a medical technician, concluded: "Pat is clear. I can understand him when he talks."

	...It is still unclear how the issue plays among those at the rod and gun clubs. Some hunters wince at the association of gun ownership with right-wing militias. But Paul Gray, interviewed at a gun and sports store in Nashua, was unfazed. He said he's never heard of a conspiracy theory that did not make at least some sense to him.

	"I believe they would take our guns away if they could," said Gray, a building contractor. "But I don't think Pat would let them."

	...Buchanan stands by his speech at the Republican national convention in Houston in 1992, when he said America was in the midst of a "cultural war" and suggested that young National Guardsmen armed with automatic weapons take back the country block by block.

	This is not a problem for his supporters, though it turns off other Republicans. Outside the Buchanan headquarters in downtown Manchester, his troops like what they hear.

	"Pat is intense," said Alex White, a young volunteer. "And that's what I like about him. If all this stuff is true, about us giving up our country to the New World Order, we need a guy in the White House like Pat. Somebody who will tell those foreigners to buzz off."

	...But mostly, on the stump and in his advertisements, Buchanan looks deadly serious. And he pushes the fear, nurturing the idea that the country is unraveling -- and that the downward spiral is being encouraged by a kind of fifth column of more moderate Republicans like Dole and publisher Malcolm S. "Steve" Forbes Jr., who have called Buchanan "an extremist" with "nutty ideas."

	Perhaps, in Buchanan's case, the attacks only make him stronger. Us and them -- a siege mentality as campaign.

	"I don't know if he'll win," said Horlick, the engineer who built rockets and was running the Buchanan office here. "But I can promise you one thing: Come a two-foot blizzard, we're going to vote. Because we believe this might be the only chance we've got to save the country before it's too late."



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1997/03/31/before-suicides-cult-was-building-for-future/5686c342-a1b6-4e7c-969d-c6a3844dbf6b/
	BEFORE SUICIDES, CULT WAS BUILDING FOR FUTURE

	..."It seemed as if they changed abruptly from a survivalist mode to escape mode," said James Thorsen, who bought the 40-acre property and everything on it last April and met several members of the group.

	Thorsen, 68, seems the kind of man who would relate. A retired real estate developer who once lived in Alexandria, Va., Thorsen shares common ground with the cult. He believes that the "end times" cited in the Bible's book of Revelation are near, and that America is fast being enveloped by the shadowy forces of the New World Order.

	During a lengthy interview in his double-wide trailer at the cult's former site, Thorsen spoke in tongues, offered apocalyptic prophesy and said he plans to continue building here to shelter relatives and like-minded refugees from the coming calamities he foresees will be brought about by the United Nations.

	...The group left behind plans that included at least one battery room, and Thorsen suggested the cult may have planned to live at least partially "off the grid," generating its own electricity. The group told its landlord in Mountainair the office space was essential because the monastery lacked adequate power and phone lines. The cult apparently was also following tire-construction techniques cited by "Earthship -- How to Build Your Own," a book that was left behind.

	The discarded tires were filled with pounded dirt and stacked into walls like bricks, creating a well-insulated space that then would be covered with wire mesh and stucco. "It took a lot of discipline to make these walls," Thorsen said. "But it was all futile. They never finished anything." Thorsen, however, was impressed that the three-foot-thick walls "would stop a rifle bullet."

	Cult members made an effort to get Thorsen and his wife to join them, sending the couple one of their rare, thick bound books, "How and When Heaven's Gate May Be Entered," the most complete history of itself the group compiled. The couple declined. A copy of the Heaven's Gate history sat on Thorsen's coffee table amid tracts on treason and conspiracies.

	The cult's book discusses "the right to be a eunuch," details "classes" given by Applewhite and lists more than 130 meetings the group staged around the country over two decades to describe its philosophy and recruit new members. The last entry was from May 6, 1996. One of three "Major Offenses" set out in the cult document was: "Sensuality -- permitting arousal in thought or in action (not nipping it in the bud)." Among the lengthy "Other Offenses" were: "Trusting my own judgment -- or using my own mind" and, finally, "Having inappropriate curiosity."


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2007/07/07/AR2007070701234.html
	At Roswell Festival, Doubt Is an Alien Concept

	...A weather balloon? Please. We are not fools.

	At least that's the thinking here. Not up on the latest ufology? The debate today is all about "disclosure," meaning not if, but when. When is the government finally going to open its top-secret files to reveal its voluminous data on the sightings, abductions and close encounters dating back to at least July 5, 1947. "The anomalies." Here in the desert Southwest. And probably Mars.

	"The secret world will fall. We want the truth embargo to end," said Stephen Bassett, the founder of X-PPAC, the first political action committee established to target the politics of UFO/ET phenomena. Bassett spoke at the festival's conference, which, along with the Alien Chase fun run, costume parades and carnival rides (Orbiter, Splash Down), have filled every motel room in Roswell, once the home of the world's only atomic warfare unit and the Enola Gay B-29 bomber.

	On Friday night, Bassett told listeners of George Noory's "Coast to Coast AM" radio show, which beamed live from the convention center to 500 stations, that: "I believe the Democrats are planning disclosures in the first months of the next administration."

	The Democrats? Naturally.

	Several ufologists agreed that "the best ET ticket" would be Democratic Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton of New York (or maybe Al Gore?) and New Mexico Gov. Bill Richardson (D), who have probably already have been briefed on the truth. "But they don't want to say so now," Bassett said. Interestingly, Richardson is quoted at the UFO Museum and Research Center ("The Truth is Here!") as stating: "I don't think the U.S. government has fully disclosed everything they know."

	Indeed. If only citizens could get access to the data. Because the people here want to know about the shadow guests, crop circles, shape shifters, crash retrievals, men in black, cattle mutilations, probes and, of course, the antimatter perpetual energy machines that have been kept under wraps in those deep-black special limited access programs run by an international cabal of military-industrial-intelligence-media interests.

	Why won't they tell all? "Because they don't want to kill the goose that lays the golden eggs," said Richard M. Dolan, author of "UFOs and the National Security State," and another of the two dozen speakers this weekend. Dolan is not certain that it is an antimatter machine. Could be anti-gravity. But they're working on something, perhaps by "reverse engineering" based upon debris -- mechanical or biological -- vacuumed up at the crash sites.

	"The topic is now being taken very seriously," Noory said. He said if the CIA could release 693 pages of the "family jewels," the worst deeds by the nation's spies, then the UFO research community asks why not the files (probably kept underground) about the extraterrestrials. "We've been visited from the very beginning of time," Noory said. "Maybe we've been seeded. Maybe we've been changed. I don't know. But somebody does."

	That somebody might be Roger Leir, author of "The Aliens and the Scalpel," about his research on the abductees who have been implanted or probed. His latest case, which he shared with UFO enthusiasts at the festival, involves "a gentleman in his 60s" who awoke recently to see "a drop of blood on his knee." CAT scans, X-rays and interviews, said Leir, revealed a 60 percent certainty that the man had been snatched by the ETs. The foreign object in his knee appeared to be a one-inch-long rod as thick as a pencil. More testing, naturally, is required. "We try to do this as scientifically as possible," he said. His pet theory? Mass genetic manipulation. But it is only a theory -- so far.

	Other lectures at the festival include "Body Snatchers in the Desert," "Were Early Contactees Ritual Magicians?" and "UFOs and the Occult: Reptilian Overlords, Abductions, Mind Control and the New World Order."

	...The crowds at the festival appear relatively sane. Many are from New Mexico, and they say they are here for the fun carnival atmosphere in tidy, laid-back Roswell. Some of the out-of-towners, the real enthusiasts, can be a little intense. They're like trekkies at a "Star Trek" convention, except that they pepper their conversations with the phrase: "And that can be authenticated."

	Guy Malone is one of the official organizers of the weekend event. "There are a lot of views expressed here, and I share them all," he said. "Angels, fairies, demons, succubuses, ETs and aliens. They might all be the same phenomena."

	Please, continue. "Hundreds of years ago," Malone explained, sporting black alien-style sunglasses, "it was elves and fairies taking you to a cave and poking you with wands or having weird sex in the woods." And today? "We call them aliens."

	Why does the public not know all this? "The single largest number one roadblock to disclosure is the mainstream media," Dolan said. For example, he said, last year there was a UFO sighting in Chicago. Did you know that?

	...The U.S. government, of course, has issued its share of reports debunking UFOs. Here in Roswell, those reports are generally seen as desperate attempts to whitewash the truth.

	Yet there is hope for the Roswell set. Apparently from the French, who have declassified some of their UFO files. The British and Brazilians have or will soon open their cases for scrutiny. But the treasure trove belongs to the U.S. government, and strangely, disclosure has not yet become an issue on the presidential campaign.

	The question is why.



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/lifestyle/style/2006/12/03/steven-spielberg-38/c061c631-4066-4f68-9823-c23eee4bd386/
	Steven Spielberg &

	By William Booth

	...A: It is literally darker. It is twilight. People are carrying signs with photographs of the missing. And putting fliers on walls with phone numbers -- have you seen this person? -- images that were iconic, tortured images indelibly imprinted on all memories from 9/11. That was the most obvious carryover to a big commercial Hollywood movie about aliens attacking Earth.

	Q: Your feelings about aliens have obviously changed over the years.

	A: No, not really.

	Q. In "Close Encounters," the humans want to go up in the spaceship. Richard Dreyfuss wants to walk toward the light. The aliens are like really smart, squishy children. In "War of the Worlds," the aliens want to make us into plant food.

	A: One bad-alien movie doesn't make me Simon Legree. I still believe there's greater good in neighboring civilizations off our planet than there is at this moment on our planet. So I still believe E.T. does live somewhere out there among the stars. And I will always believe it, all my life.

	Spielberg says this emphatically.



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1998/08/14/girls-murder-focuses-light-on-hidden-specter-of-sibling-abuse/f2a1d72e-d34c-4b11-bae6-be27a85379d6/
	GIRL'S MURDER FOCUSES LIGHT ON HIDDEN SPECTER OF SIBLING ABUSE

	Stephanie Crowe was, her pastor recalls, a vivacious, bright and popular 12-year-old girl, "the center of attention," volunteer of the year for her work at the local library, and "just like a little angel."

	Her brother Michael, say prosecutors and police, was the kind of 14-year-old who enjoyed reading about medieval torture. He dressed in black and took his meals in his room, where he kept a stack of tabloid magazine articles about the O.J. Simpson murder trial. And he harbored an intense sibling rivalry that became a "pure hatred," one friend said, for his sister Stephanie.

	So, according to the police, on the night of Jan. 21, in a comfortable middle-class enclave in sunny Southern California, Michael and another boy crept into Stephanie's bedroom while a third boy kept watch outside. Stephanie was stabbed nine times in the chest and neck with a 10-inch hunting knife, the blade wiping itself clean as it passed back and forth through the comforter that kept her warm.

	...The causes of sibling abuse are complex and varied. They include mental illness and drug or alcohol abuse, and the abusing children could have been abused themselves. Moreover, several experts have noted that today's children grow up in a culture in which they are surrounded by violence that is cartoonish and graphic -- in video games, television, movies and even mainstream journalism, which has been filled recently with sensational stories about children killing children in Arkansas, Kentucky, Mississippi and Oregon.

	...Police initially became suspicious of her brother Michael for two reasons: He did not appear sufficiently distraught the next morning, and he told police that he awoke at around 4:30 a.m. to go into the kitchen. If he did so, police say, he would have had to pass by his dead sister.

	...She and the boys' parents maintain that the three are typical, albeit highly intelligent, young teenagers, into cartoons and fantasy games, not murder.



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1993/09/24/as-divers-search-the-worst-is-finding-the-children/71b4419c-0333-4d70-9d13-3da0dd4a864e/
	AS DIVERS SEARCH, 'THE WORST IS FINDING THE CHILDREN'

	CHICKASAW, ALA., SEPT. 23 -- Theirs is not the kind of work easily discussed. For two days, Mark Lampkin and John Barnett have been diving for bodies in the muddy waters of the Bayou Canot, scene of the worst train wreck in Amtrak history.

	..."The worst is finding the children," Lampkin said.

	They found another today, a 5-year-old floating about 100 yards from the wreck, bringing the total number of dead to 44. Three people are missing, authorities said tonight.

	"The little girl was just sitting there like she was reaching out to somebody," Barnett said. "To me, it looked like a little doll floating in the water."

	The divers said victims were found in their seats in the submerged cars. One passenger was locked in a bathroom. Three crew members assumed dead are believed trapped in an engine in 15 feet of mud on the banks of the bayou.

	...After a woman in his car screamed, "Oh, my God, we're all going to die," Dopheide said, he tore off his shoes and shirt, wiggled through a window and jumped into the water. One by one, he ordered passengers to jump toward him, and then he dragged them to safety.

	"I don't know what I would have done without him," said Adele Massaro, a pastoral assistant at a Roman Catholic church in San Antonio. "He said jump, and I believed he would hold onto me."

	Many passengers and crew members said they were terrified and dazed after the three locomotives and first four cars of the 11-unit train plunged into the delta swamp about 3 a.m. Wednesday. 

	..."I was surprised how calm they were," said Debbie Bryars, a Mobile fire department medic who arrived at a nearby bridge about 5 a.m. "They had just been in a train wreck, and what did we do but put them back on another train."

	By 6 a.m., however, the sad work of collecting the dead began in earnest.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1998/01/23/kaczynski-pleads-guilty-to-bombings/63d323a1-5477-4d6f-8646-2f313bd37cdd/
	KACZYNSKI PLEADS GUILTY TO BOMBINGS

	By William Booth January 23, 1998

	...Kaczynski's admission of guilt in the bombings closed one of the longest-running, most expensive and most bizarre investigations in FBI history -- which ended only when Kaczynski's brother alerted authorities soon after recognizing the fevered anti-technology themes in a 35,000-word manifesto published in September 1995 by The Washington Post and the New York Times.

	..."Do you understand you will spend the rest of your life in prison?" U.S. District Judge Garland Burrell Jr asked the seated 55-year-old defendant.

	"Yes, your honor," Kaczynski replied clearly.

	He showed no sadness, anger or regret. Instead, he seemed almost like the bright mathematics student he once was, when he chirped, "Guilty, your honor," to the ultimate question.

	At one point, Kaczynski even made a little joke. Asked by the judge what his occupation was, Kaczynski answered, "That's an open question. I guess my occupation now is jail inmate."

	As prosecutors read lengthy descriptions of the circumstances and evidence surrounding his 16 bombings, several family members of victims wept quietly.

	Yet Kaczynski himself was often conferring with one of his attorneys while some previously unreleased excerpts from his coded journals and experiment logs were read aloud. The entries provided a chilling reminder that Kaczynski is not a harmless eccentric railing against environmental degradation and technological advancement.

	In one 1985 journal entry read in court, Kaczynski expresses glee after hearing that one of his devices killed Hugh Scrutton outside his Sacramento computer store. Noting that Scrutton had been "blown to bits," his journal entry went on: "Excellent! Humane way to eliminate someone. Probably never felt a thing." He refers to a $25,000 reward by writing, "Rather flattering."

	...The search for the Unabomber was the most extensive manhunt ever, spanning almost two decades, as federal agents searched in vain for an elusive terrorist who built increasingly sophisticated bombs, placed them in carved wooden boxes and books, stamped his deadly works "FC" (for Freedom Club), placed Eugene O'Neill commemorative stamps on the packages and mailed them to his victims.

	The victims included a Yale computer scientist, an astronaut candidate, a Sacramento forestry lobbyist, a public relations executive, the president of United Airlines, and a geneticist.

	The bomber, known for years only by a sketch of a mustached man in hooded sweat shirt and sunglasses, so terrorized the nation that he forced two of the most-respected newspapers in the nation to accede to his demands and publish the ranting manifesto in exchange for a promise to cease his murderous spree.



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1998/01/24/kaczynskis-brother-expresses-sadness-relief-in-aftermath-of-plea/6ff54192-6fec-4781-ac03-dd0dc1c85776/
	By William Booth

	...David Kaczynski felt the almost indescribable connection that can exist between two brothers.

	"Sitting behind him in court, I felt that bond very powerfully," David explained 

	...The connection David Kaczynski was talking about, he said, is stronger even than his feelings of sadness, regret and relief in the aftermath

	...David said in his soft, measured voice. "I think he loved me. I know I love Ted very much."

	The FBI amassed thousands of leads during almost two decades of a bizarre terrorist campaign. It was the most extensive manhunt in FBI history. But agents did not have a clue who the elusive Unabomber was until David, at his wife's urging, read the famous 35,000-word manifesto, saw the themes echoed over a lifetime and turned his brother in.

	...In a few months or a year, he suspects no one will care about his role in the Unabomber case anymore. 


hehehe


articles drawing conclusions from specific technical reports:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1989/06/08/alien-molecules-linked-to-dinosaur-extinction/58fa05e7-409f-4136-ad26-e6c784cd133d/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1989/09/28/nitrogen-fertilizers-may-be-adding-to-greenhouse-effect/931392a3-3a48-48a3-a763-cf50a8f6919b/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/05/20/ironing-out-greenhouse-effect/aac0c6c0-d2f8-4a0d-bf5a-a15630f1dddb/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/06/28/polar-icecap-thinning-british-researcher-finds/f06c6404-5872-4a48-80bb-1ad3e8d61371/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/07/13/politicians-hail-bacteria-in-oil-spill/f2f2d294-f9c8-4a41-9977-2a3803a77d31/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/08/10/testing-device-is-blamed-for-hubble-flaw/c67badf6-833d-4cb4-8b47-ba687874d4d9/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/10/12/warm-seas-killing-coral-reefs/d7e7f1dc-96ba-42ba-9755-0460935b7982/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/11/28/hubble-report-faults-builder-nasa/b34ef612-9c43-4331-8678-6417e09a0a9e/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/01/29/new-models-chill-some-predictions-of-severely-overheated-earth/f81c2dbb-b322-497e-a3cd-eb37a54a078d/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1991/02/23/amazon-basin-may-be-eating-saharas-dust/3b630399-12d0-4426-bea7-7cba8d7665d5/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1991/08/14/philippine-volcano-dust-temporarily-cools-earth/c8c18751-908a-451c-bb55-2285cb7e8432/


articles with negative societal impact (not otherwise fitting into categories above):

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/06/10/utah-faculty-joins-cold-fusion-controversy/4f939ae1-2748-4bb3-8fa2-5052f602dd0b/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1989/12/08/pregnancy-disorder-tied-to-condoms-diaphragms/4eadc2cd-9ad5-42af-8ffc-1abcb1222de2/



...


Booth misrepresented a technical report in his reporting. Is this a one-off or a habit?

Hubble one:


https://ntrs.nasa.gov/archive/nasa/casi.ntrs.nasa.gov/19910003124.pdf
	6. Perkin-Elmer line management did not review or supervise their Optical
	Operations Division adequately. In fact, the management structure provided a
	strong block against communication between the people actually doing the job
	and higher level experts both within and outside of P-E. 

	7. The P-E Technical Advisory Group did not probe at all deeply into the
	optical manufacturing processes and, although they recognized the fragility of the
	measuring approach, they did not adequately assert their concerns or follow up
	with data reviews. This is particularly surprising since the members were aware of
	the history of manufacture of other Ritchey-Chretien telescopes, where spherical
	aberration was known to be a common problem.

	8. The most capable optical scientists at P-E were involved closely with the
	production of the 1.5-m demonstration mirror and the design of the HST mirror
	and the test apparatus. However, fabrication of the HST mirror was the
	responsibility of the Optical Operations Division of P-E, which did not include
	optical design scientists and which did not use the skills external to the Division
	which were available at Perkin-Elmer. 



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/11/28/hubble-report-faults-builder-nasa/b34ef612-9c43-4331-8678-6417e09a0a9e/
	Perkin-Elmer, which is widely reported to have built similar mirrors for spy satellites, won the contract to make Hubble's optics largely because of its expertise in designing and manufacturing mirrors. Yet, according to members of the investigating team, Perkin-Elmer's leading optical expert, a man who literally wrote the textbook on testing large mirrors, was never informed of the tests that revealed the flaws.

	...The report and interviews with the investigating team reveal that the misshapen mirror aboard the orbiting observatory was built by a group of technicians who had never before made such a large and uniquely shaped mirror, at a time a decade ago when the entire Hubble program was in disarray.

	Yet, these same technicians operated a "closed shop" and denied access to outside experts and overseers, according to the investigation. Even NASA's lone quality-control officer at the contractor's facility was not allowed to witness key tests done on the mirror. Moreover, Allen noted that even if NASA's man on the scene had been allowed to monitor the tests, he was not an optics expert and would therefore have been incapable of understanding the data that pointed toward a major flaw in the telescope's main mirror.



anything going on here?

doesn't look like Booth lied, just ommitted interesting things


https://ntrs.nasa.gov/archive/nasa/casi.ntrs.nasa.gov/19910003124.pdf
	...The Optical Operations Division of P-E imposed its own access limitations to the Danbury metrology area where the RNC and INC were assembled. This area was secured by a cipher lock door, and only metrology engineers from the Wilton facility were allowed access. QA personnel from both NASA and P-E were not informed that this test equipment was being assembled and were aware of its existence only after the RNC assembly was moved to the OTA test chamber. No formal manufacturing-process paperwork on this activity was filed; consequently, the QA organization did not become involved.   

	The Optical Operations Division of P-E imposed its own access limitations to the Danbury metrology area where the RNC and INC were assembled. This area was secured by a cipher lock door, and only metrology engineers from the Wilton facility were allowed access. QA personnel from both NASA and P-E were not informed that this test equipment was being assembled and were aware of its existence only after the RNC assembly was moved to the OTA test chamber. No formal manufacturing-process paperwork on this activity was filed; consequently, the QA organization did not become involved. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/11/28/hubble-report-faults-builder-nasa/b34ef612-9c43-4331-8678-6417e09a0a9e/
	The investigators' final report on the malfunctioning Hubble Space Telescope, which was released yesterday, tells a story of missed opportunity and miscommunication, with NASA officials failing to provide even rudimentary supervision of technicians who three times ignored tests that uncovered the crucial flaw that now plagues the $1.6 billion telescope.

	The investigating team concluded that both the National Aeronautics and Space Administration and its main contractor failed to monitor in any detail the manufacture of the telescope's most essential components, the two mirrors that gather and concentrate starlight from the heavens.


charge against Booth for this one isn't lying but incompetence: "Contractor locks NASA QA out of production of broken hubble space telescope" makes for interesting headline and serves public interest to know it, the two things journalists are supposed to be responsible for the people paying their salary and their readers who trust them, but Booth didn't do a good job here. Also missing that the most capable scientists helped with the test mirror but skipped out for the actual mirror for the Hubble telescope. Booth manages to make an important and interesting case sound boring.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/08/06/hubble-flaw-was-found-in-81/efee51aa-0466-4d0d-8a6a-8a5c379b2545/
	HUBBLE FLAW WAS FOUND IN '81
	By William Booth August 6, 1990

	A test a decade ago revealed an apparent flaw in the main mirror of the blurry-eyed Hubble Space Telescope, but key NASA officials and outside experts charged with overseeing the project say they were never informed of the problem.

	Tests on the telescope's main mirror in 1981 uncovered a defect called spherical aberration, according to scientists investigating the problem and an optical expert who worked on the mirrors at Perkin-Elmer Corp., the company that designed, built and tested the telescope's optical system. The expert requested that his name not be used because of the ongoing investigation.

 	...Differing Results

	The two null correctors obtained different results, indicating that either the Hubble mirror or one of the test devices was flawed. But it appears that the discrepancy was ignored. No more tests were done.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/07/03/hubble-monitors-say-they-were-overworked-overconfident/609c6c75-f5d0-47b4-8936-f7bd9d5cf241/
	HUBBLE MONITORS SAY THEY WERE OVERWORKED, OVERCONFIDENT
	By William Booth July 3, 1990

	Former government scientists and outside experts appointed by NASA to review the manufacture of the Hubble Space Telescope's mirrors said yesterday that they were often overworked and overwhelmed by the task and did not rigorously check crucial tests done by the mirror manufacturer.



Booth wrote an article on the problem of the test results being ignored and on the NASA officials assigned to monitor the production at PE being "overworked", but somehow managed to forget to report that these monitors were locked out of PE four months later. Apparently he was really interested in that problem until the report came out. Or, he's a fucking shill.



oil-eating bacteria:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/07/13/politicians-hail-bacteria-in-oil-spill/f2f2d294-f9c8-4a41-9977-2a3803a77d31/
	POLITICIANS HAIL BACTERIA IN OIL SPILL
	By William Booth July 13, 1990

	Texas politicians and an entrepreneurial scientist announced yesterday that their at-sea test of oil-eating bacteria on a large spill last month significantly reduced oil in the water and showed no signs of harming marine life.

	But the state laboratory that analyzed water samples from the Gulf of Mexico test site said it was scientifically impossible to prove the bacteria cleaned up the oil and that more statistically valid testing needs to be done.

	...state-run tests on the bacteria's effectiveness were inconclusive.

	"From a statistically valid standpoint, you can't say there was decrease in oil concentration," said Buck Henderson of the Lower Colorado River Authority, the state facility that tested the treated water samples.

	...Using a 55-gallon drum, a pump, hose and nozzle, researchers with Alpha Environmental, a Texas-based biotechnology company, last month sprayed about 110 pounds of bacteria and fertilizer on the Mega Borg spill.

	According to the researchers with Alpha, the treated oil changed color, indicating that the bacteria were eating the oil and turning it into fatty acids that could be taken up by other marine animals. Aerial reconnaissance later revealed no oil in the area that was sprayed.

	However, since the treated spill was not marked with buoys, researchers had no way of knowing whether the area observed contained the same water. Oil also deteriorates in water as natural bacteria consume it and waves break it up.

	To help decide whether the bacteria worked, Alpha did a second test in which some oil patches were treated and some were not. But sampling problems made it difficult to show significant differences, Henderson said.

	Alpha chief scientist Carl Oppenheimer said the results showed a trend. "It was not absolutely positive. But it was positive enough to give the state confidence to go ahead."


https://www.newspapers.com/image/20078078/
	July 13, 1990

	Officials: Oil-eating microbes worked in Mega Borg tests

	...The water sample tests, which showed that surface oil was reduced in the area that had been treated, were performed by laboratories at the Lower Colorado River Authority.

	"Studies to date indicate that bioremediation holds great promise as a major weapon in the fight against oil spills," the lab report states.


http://www.allreadable.com/32589gZz
	The microbe level in the ponds quickly returned to normal. Water samples were taken for analysis by lower Colorado River Authority experts and later reported to be non-toxic and effective. Then the Mega Borg loaded with 38 million gallons of crude oil caught fire. For several days it burned out of control in the open Gulf of Mexico. Commissioner Mauro and the Land Office pushed for and finally won the right to use this potential disaster for the first open sea testing of the oil-eating microbes. The powdered microbes are mixed with water then applied using standard fire fighting equipment. Cost is about one tenth of the price of current spill response techniques. Again, samples were taken and results measured. Later in Houston, Commissioner Mauro and Texas Water Commissioner Buck Wynne announced the results. Commissioner Mauro >> "If you can believe yours eyes we had a great success." "And if you can believe the scientific results of our small-scale application test, we're on the verge of a major breakthrough."


https://news.utexas.edu/2016/05/09/potential-of-oil-eating-bacteria-from-bp-oil-spill-decoded
	PORT ARANSAS, Texas — Microbiologists at The University of Texas at Austin and their colleagues have cracked the genetic code of how bacteria broke down oil to help clean up the Deepwater Horizon oil spill. The findings, published in the journal Nature Microbiology, reveal that some bacteria have far greater potential for consuming oil than was previously known. The research also has applications for responding to future oil spills and other ecological disasters, while shedding light on the ways in which tiny microbes played an outsized role in limiting damage from the 2010 spill caused by the explosion of a BP oil rig...


Booth says "state-run tests on the bacteria's effectiveness were inconclusive", tests show "surface oil was reduced in the area that had been treated". This was the first time bacteria was used on an oil spill and it was a new thing to the public, but Booth ommitted the line from the report that "Studies to date indicate that bioremediation holds great promise as a major weapon in the fight against oil spills" or any mention that the bacteria had already been shown to be effective in a lab.

Added that "effectivness of microbes on oil has been well established for years. But many researchers question whether the bacteria will be able to rapidly break down the oil contained in a large spill at sea" in report on preparation for 2nd experiment 6 days later: https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/06/17/2nd-test-of-oil-eating-microbes-planned-at-spill/08fa5260-14dc-4a79-9a12-92caf0b26a84/

If Booth is consistent in misintepreting reports on scientific discoveries to the public he's inconsistent in being cautious about them: when the carbon dating paper cautioned it's data was incomplete, Booth declared Carbon dating over; when the Lower Colorado River Authority report recommend optimism, Booth stressed the results were inconclusive.



Booth writes that human brain has a receptor specifically for marijuana and question is settled:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1990/08/09/marijuana-receptor-exists-in-brain-study-confirms/962fffb4-ac76-467f-a5d7-db12cf79cd4f/


actual author wrote in report that brain has receptor "responsive to psychoactive cannabinoids" and question not settled:

http://www.druglibrary.net/crl/receptors/receptors/Matsuda_et.al_90_Structure_Nature.pdf

others report that it doesn't make sense that human brain evolved to smoke plant from central asia and fruit flies have same receptors:

https://www.newscientist.com/article/mg12717293-500-science-the-switch-that-turns-the-brain-on-to-cannabis/



NAS climate change report:


NY Times on same papers:

https://www.nytimes.com/1991/09/18/business/economic-scene-warmer-globe-greener-pastures.html

https://www.nytimes.com/1991/04/11/us/quick-steps-urged-on-warming-threat.html



https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	SO WHAT IF IT'S GETTING HOT?

	By William Booth September 22, 1991

	LAST WEEK, as eco-technocrats from a hundred countries bumped heads in Nairobi over how best to confront global warming, and as Washington wilted in a freak September heat wave, the National Academy of Sciences quietly issued a report with a remarkable conclusion: When it comes to the greenhouse effect, there's nothing to worry about.

	If global warming is indeed a reality, if the temperature and the seas rise in the course of the next century, humans will adapt quite nicely, the report concludes. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=RD4rAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA1&lpg=PA1
	POLICY IMPLICATIONS OF GREENHOUSE WARMING

	Report of the Adaption Panel

	...National Academy of Sciences

	..August 23, 1991

	...According to subsequent advice received from members of Congress, the NAS study was to focus on radiatively active trace gases from human sources, or "greenhouse warming." This report is one of the products of that study.

	...The work of the study was conducted by four panels. The Effects Panel examined what is known about changing climatic conditions and related effects. The Migration panel looked at options for reducing or reversing the onset of potential global warming. The Adaption Panel assessed the impacts of possible climate change on humanity and nature and the policies that could help people and nature adapt to those changes. The Synthesis Panel, chaired by Daniel J. Evans, was charged with weighing the effects, mitigation, and adaption and reaching comprehensive findings and recommendations.

	This is the report of the Adaption Panel


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	...The National Academy of Sciences has been wrestling with the greenhouse issue for years. In the spring, it issued another of its cautious reports, concluding the United States should adopt "effective but inexpensive" actions to slow down projected warming. That means reducing carbon dioxide and other gases produced by automobiles and industry, but doing so gradually, at least to begin with.



https://www.nap.edu/read/1794/chapter/9
	Findings and Conclusions

	...People in this country could probably adapt to the likely changes associated with greenhouse warming. The costs, however, could be substantial. Investment in migration measures acts as insurance protection against the great uncertainties and the possibility of dramatic surprises. In addition, the panel believes that substantial mitigation can be accomplished at modest cost. In other words, insurance is cheap.

	...Recommendations

	Despite the great uncertainties, greenhouse warming is a potential threat sufficient to justify action now. Some current actions could reduce the speed and magnitude of greenhouse warming; others could prepare people and natural systems of plants and animals for future adjustments for the conditions likely to accompany greenhouse warming.

	...The United States could reduce or offset its greenhouse gas emissions by between 10 and 40 percent of 1990 levels at low cost, or at some net savings, if proper policies are implemented.

	...Continue the aggressive phaseout of CFC and other halocarbon emissions

	...Reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases during energy use and consumption by enhancing conservation and efficiency

	...Make greenhouse warming a key factor in planning for our future energy supply mix.

	...Reduce global deforestation

	...Maintain basic, applied, and experimental agricultural research to help farmers adapt to climate change and thus ensure ample food

	...Make water supply more robust by coping with present variability by increasing efficiency of use through water markets and by better management of present systems of supply

	...Move to slow present losses in biodiversity

	...Improve weather forecasts, especially of extremes, for weeks and seasons to ease adaptation to climate change

	...Conduct field research on entire systems of species over many years to learn how CO2 enrichment alters the mix of species and changes the total production or quality of biomass. Research should be accelerated to determine how greenhouse warming might affect biodiversity

	...The United States should participate fully with officials at an appropriate level in international agreements and in programs to address greenhouse warming, including diplomatic conventions and research and development efforts

	...Q & A

	...Is it better to prevent greenhouse warming now or wait and adapt to the consequences?

	...First, will it be possible to live with the consequences if nothing is done now? the panel's analysis suggested that advanced, industrialized countries will be able to adapt to most of the anticipated consequences of additional greenhouse warming without great economic hardship. In some regions, climate and related conditions may be noticeably worse, but in other regions better. Countries that currently face difficulty coping with extreme climatic events, or whose tradition coping mechanisms are breaking down, may be sorely pressed by the climatic changes accompanying an equivalent doubling of atmosphereic CO2 concentrations. It is important to recognize that there may be dramatic improvement or disastrous deterioration in specific locales. In addition, this analysis applies to the next 30 to 50 years. The situation may be different beyond that time horizon.

	Natural communities of plants and animals, however, face much greater difficulties. Greenhouse warming would likely stress such ecosystems sufficiently to break them apart, resulting in a restructuring of the community in any given locale. New species would be likely to gain dominance, with a different overall mix of species. ...Greenhouse warming would most likely change the face of the natural landscape. Similar changes would occur in lakes and oceans.

	In addition, there are possible extremely adverse consequences, such as changing ocean currents, that are poorly understood today.

	...Second, does it matter when interventions are made? Yes, for three different kinds of reasons. Because greenhouse gases have relatively long lifetimes in the atmosphere, and because of lags in the response of the system, their effect build up over time. These time-dependent phenomena lead to the long-term "equilibrium" warming being greater than the "realized" warming at any given point in time. These dynamic aspects of the climate system show the importance of acting now to change tradition patterns of behavior that we recently recognized to be detrimental, such as heavy reliance on fossil fuels. In addition, the implications of intervention programs for the overall economy vary with time. Gradual imposition of restraints is much less disruptive to the overall economy than their sudden application. ...some investments can be thought of as insurance, or payments now to avoid undesireable outcomes in the future. The choice is made more complicated by the fact that outcomes are highly uncertain.

	...What should be done now?

	The panel developed a set of recommended options in five areas: reducing or offsetting emissions, enhancing adaption to greenhouse warming, improving knowledge for future decisions, evaluating geoengineering options, and excercising international leadership. The panel reccomends moving decisively to undertake *all* of the actions described under questions 51 through 55 below.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	But this latest academy panel takes another approach. It assumes Earth is going to warm, and then dares to ask the politically incorrect question: So what?

	A temperature rise of two or three or four degrees spread out over 50 or 60 years? No big deal, say these adaptationists. We'll crank up the AC and increase electric power generation by 12 to 22 percent. So what if it costs $400 billion? It all depends on how you discount the investment over time.

	What about climatic refugees? It's happened before, say the adaptationists, and it'll happen again. The Irish fled the warm, moist summers of the 1840s that led to the potato blight. Midwesterners fled the Dust Bowl. This time around, Texans might move north to Minnesota. It costs, on average, $1,500 to transport the contents of a 450-square-foot apartment 400 miles to a six-degree-cooler climate. That's not going to break the bank.


https://books.google.com/books?id=RD4rAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA94&lpg=PA94
	...Within the United States

	The U.S. population is among the most mobile in the world.

	...Variability of climate in the same zone over time has also driven migration. For instance, in the 19th century and the first four decades of the 20th century in the Great Plains region, droughts fueled outmigration of thousands of people. Government policies and private acts can mitigate the effects of drought, as is demonstrated by reduced migration from the Great Plains during drought periods after the 1930s.

	...Global

	...In developing countries the governments and most of the people do not have the economic means to use improved technologies to adapt to climate change. As such, larger numbers of people are potentially sensitive to climate shifts, particularly if the latter erodes the sustenance base.

	...Crude estimates suggest that about a quarter of the world's population resides within 100 km of a coast and would therefore be vulnerable to sea-level rise.

	...If projections of sea-level rise are correct, in the latter part of the 21st century, coastal populations may need to protect their homes or abandon them. Given existing investments in U.S. coastal settlements, people and governments are likely to respond by protecting those investments (see Section 3.9, Settlements and Coastal Structures).

	...Concentrating on countries that would be hard pressed to build dikes, a 1-m rise in sea level, which is more than our assumption, would cover areas currently accounting for about 7 percent of habitable land and 5 percent of the population in Bangladesh and 12 percent of the habitable land and 14 percent of the population in Egypt (Broadus, 1990). Thus, in those two countries alone, a 1-m rise in sea level could displace 14 million people.

	Were climate change to displace settled populations in the world's most populous countries, China and India, significant numbers of refugees could be produced. ...The impact of such increases would undoubtedly be greatest on neighboring countries in the Asian region.

	If climate changes were greater than we have assumed, emigration from the United States could increase. This option would, of course, be limited to the small proportion of the population, largely the wealthy and educated, who would be able to locate jobs in other countries or develop the contacts that would allow such moves to take place.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	A rise in sea level of one or two or three feet? The adaptationists envision dikes, levees, pumps and berms to hold it back. The Dutch had to build them, and they're doing okay. What's a seawall cost these days? In South Carolina, about $2,000 a foot, or about 6 percent of the value of the property the seawall is protecting.


https://books.google.com/books?id=RD4rAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA85&lpg=PA85
	...Harbor facilities, bridges, and certain recerational facilities, though suffering no physical damage from sea-level rise, will nonetheless be impaired or rendered useless because of their dependence on design distances to the water level.

	Sea-level rise will cause other water-related difficulties in urban areas besides those that result from innundation, high water level, and erosion. The associated rise in groundwater table may reduce the ability of the soil to assimilate rainfall and result in larger surface runoff. There will likely be increased seepage into basements, adverse effects on building foundations, and increase corosion of buried pipelines.

	In occasional instance,s groundwater may intrude into landfills and waste disposal sites, resulting in leaching of hazardous materials.

	...Retreat and abandonment are not likely to be economical alternatives for major parts of urban areas. Some isolated facilities, particularly those that are obsolete and/or in disrepair, may be abandoned. But in most cases the replacement value of urban areas will make protection or adaption of one sort of another, though expensive, the best alternative.

	...Gibbs (1986) suggested that the cost of seawall construction to protect Charleston, South Carolina, would be approximately $2,000 per foot of length, amounting to approximately 6 percent of the value of the protected property.

	...Many bridges ... will either need to be raised or will block marine navigation ...Other structures ... may need to be raised or strengthened because they will be insufficiently high to protect them from storm damage.

	...waste treatment facilities may, in some cases, need to be moved to permit discharge and/or otherwise protected to prevent damage

	...Changes in groundwater levels combined with higher backwaters in river and drainage channels will require major improvements in urban sewage and drainge systems. Walker et al. (1989) suggests that in the city of Miami the cost of dikes and levees to protect from direct sea-level rise will be relatively small, while the upgrading of storm seweres and drainage will be very expensive. In any city in which tese problems occur, pipes and drainge channels will have to be increased in size either by replacement or by the addition of supplemental facilities. Systems that have depended upon gravity may need to shift to forced drainage or, in cases within tidal range, to combinations of locks and flap gates that permit drainage during low tides. Airports in coastal cities, often on landfill in estuaries or bays, may require special attention in this regard

	...The elevated groundwater table can require additional adaptations.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	Agriculture? If the greenhouse world is drier rather than wetter, which is entirely possible, we'll extend irrigation. We'll create genetically altered super-wheat. We've done it before. A new strain of cultivated plant, used these days for only about six years before it is replaced by another strain, costs about $1 million to develop. Farmers are among the most adaptable and ingenious of people in the pursuit of commerce.


https://books.google.com/books?id=RD4rAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA46&lpg=P46
	A neglected matter is how climate change would alter the organization and resources of soil, water and the genetic basis for crops that undergirds farming. ...washed-out bridges can be rebuilt, whereas eroded soils are not so easily repaired and genes from extinct species can neither improve varieties nor make new crops.

	So far, improvements in farming in many places have increased yields from the constant supply of natural resources as fast as human demands have grown or faster. Agricultural research and the farmers who apply its results have been highly successful. The clear question is: If climate changes during several decades, can these same people maintain the foundation of natural resources and raise more food for the escalating demands and numbers of people?

	Soil is easily forgotten when new maps of vegetation zones are drawn for new climates. On the one hand, a new climate of wind or rain could erode an old productive soil. On the other hand, if the climate becomes favorable to crops where it was once arctic but the substratum is granite, centuries may pass before the soil becomes as fertile as the climate is favorable (Jenn, 1941; Joffe, 1949).

	Moisture to sustain crops depends on amount and timeliness of precipitation and its balance against evaporation. The balance also fixes how much water is left to supply irrigation water by running of into streams and reservoirs and percolating into aquifers.

	Only a few planet species among millions that grew at one time or another provided the genes for the crops taht feed farm animals and us. Within a crop, genetic uniformity can cause vulnerability, as when Southern corn leaf blight arose and struck the U.S. corn crop in 1970. Fortunately, the genetic diversity of U.S. crops was broader in 1980 than in 1970. Neverthless, we should be concerned that a cliamte change might extinguish wild races of major crops that might furnish valuable genes or even extinguish speicies that might become crops.

	...The major findings of these studies were that, without the direct effect of CO2, yields of wheat, soybeans, and corn declined in the Great Lakes, Southeast, and Great Plains regions, except in the northermost latitudes, where frost-free season was lengthened. Decreases in yield stemmed mostly from the shortened life span of crops caused by higher temperatures. Differences among climate senarios led to predicted yields ranging from mild gains to server losses. Location within regions was important. Irrigation moderated yield losses as did higher CO2, least in the southeast and most in the north. However, significant increases in irrigation requirement were noted, especially with the more severe climate scenario. The adaptations tested, such as longer-season varieties of corn in Illinois, did not fully compensate for the loss of yield.

	...in the recent report...

	...- It has not yet been demonstrated conclusively whether, on average, global agriculture potential will increase or decrease.

	- Severe negative effects are possible in some regions, particularly those of high present-day vulnerability that are least able to adjust technically.

	- Two broad sets of regions appear most vulnerable: (1) some semi-arid tropical and subtropical regions (possibly western Arabia, the Maghrab, and western Africa, Horn of Africa, southern Africa, and eastern Brazil) and (2) some humid tropical and equatorial regions (possibly southeast Asia and central America).

	- Changes causes water shortages in regions that are now exporters of grains (southern Europe, southern United States, parts of South America, and western Austrailia) may lessen their productive potential.


	...Can Farming Adapt?

	...Tropical savannah or tropical desert might exist where we now grow corn. Nonetheless, there are some indications that adaptions can be effected even to large changes in climate.

	...Hard red winter wheat has cultural and economic advantages over the competing spring wheats.

	...Improved irrigation efficiencies during 1950 to 1980 reduced per-acre applications ... by a third.

	...of course ground water supplies will not increase, but rather will decline more rapidly. Additionally, ...demand for limited water supplies for other uses--municipal and industrial, fish and wildlife, recreation and navigation--may make water too expensive for agriculture. This trend is already occurring in the arid West and would likely be accentuated by any climatic change that decreases supplies or increases demand.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	The report is also being criticized for its optimism. For the most part, the adaptationists see a very different future than do many environmental activists, who tend to be a more pessimistic bunch.

	Look, for example, into the crystal ball of Michael Oppenheimer, a senior scientist with the Environmental Defense Fund, and his colleague Robert Boyle, the authors of the briskly-selling book "Dead Heat."

	Here is an example of their vision of the mid-21st century: "In the Cheasapeake Bay, Long Island Sound, Narragansett Bay and other coastal waters that once gave purpose and delight to sailors, swimmers, fishermen, and children building sand castles, the water is rankest in the summer . . .. Stimulated by warm, still weather, algal blooms deoxygenate the water below. Suddenly half a million menhaden, maybe a million, go belly up. After a week, the oily fish stink too much even for the gulls, but eels still burrow into the bloated fish to gorge on internal organs. Above the rotting carcasses washed up on shore, next to the shattered houses half tumbled into the water, the air is filled with the ceaseless buzzing of greenhead flies and the scurrying of rats' feet over broken glass."


http://www.watoday.com.au/wa-news/absolutely-putrid-fishermen-hunt-source-of-foul-smell-around-perth-s-southern-beaches-20180418-p4zadu.html
	Locals living along the coast of Perth's southern suburbs are attempting to uncover the cause behind a foul-smelling sludge that washed up on many of the area's main beaches on Tuesday morning.

	Beaches in Rockingham, Safety Bay, Cockburn and Fremantle reported detecting the smell, with a significant amount of algae found on many of the suburban beaches.

	While many locals pinched their noses and hoped for the wind to change, Tim Barlow of Tim's Tackle Plus in Guildford took matters into his own hands when a friend and customer told him about their experience fishing near Point Peron earlier in the week.

	"What brought it to a head was one of my customers yesterday caught some crayfish by Point Peron," he said.

	"He took them home, went to cook them – and excuse the language – but when he cracked them open they looked like sh-t, the flesh was brown, and it actually smelled like sh-t.

	"He actually had to wash his hands multiple times to get rid of the stench after breaking them open. It’s pretty disgusting.

	"The beaches down there stink. I’ve got a fella walking around Safety Bay right now and he’s found a few dead seagulls – a little bit more than normal.

	"I’ve got a few other images I’ve been sent of fluro green algae just staining the sand and stuff.

	"There’s a lot of algae growing – there’s a pink algae, there’s a green algae, and then there’s the brown effluent itself."

	Mr Barlow reported what he saw to Recfishwest, who said they had since contacted the Water Corporation about it.

	...The Water Corporation said Tuesday's event was most likely due to an "algal bloom", as supported by a statement made by the City of Rockingham last week.

	"The algal bloom at Shoalwater Bay is not a result of the temporary decline in the quality of treated wastewater leaving the Woodman Point Wastewater Treatment Plant," a spokeswoman said.

	..."Advice from the Department of Biodiversity, Conservation and Attractions was that the algal bloom was widespread along the Perth coast and parts of Rottnest, indicating that it was not associated with the temporary wastewater issue.


http://wlrn.org/post/new-funds-spur-red-tide-research
	Florida beachgoers often imagine a day on the water. Colorful umbrellas peppered across the sand, the sound of waves foaming as they crash onto the shore and the inescapable smell of saltwater nipping at your senses.

	Sometimes, instead of this picturesque scene, a sickening odor of dead fish wafts across empty beaches, local restaurants are closed because they can’t prepare seafood, and residents even experience trouble breathing. The culprit is red tide.

	A new federal budget gives the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) an additional $8 million to research the causes of red tide and other harmful algal blooms.

	“Up to this point, we’ve been doing red tide research for over 30 years,” Mote Marine Laboratory environmental health project manager Tracy Fanara said. “The data gaps that we have are because we’ve never had enough funding to constantly take samples.”

	Red tides have a significant impact on Florida’s economy. According to NOAA, harmful algae blooms cause $82 million in economic losses to the seafood, restaurant and tourism industries each year in the United States.

	In addition to its economic influence, red tide has a direct impact marine ecosystems – the bacteria have contributed to about 160 manatee deaths this year.

	“Red tide poses a serious threat to our environment, marine life and economy,” Congressman Vern Buchanan said in a prepared statement. “We need to understand more about the toxins in red tide so we can stop the damaging effects.” 


https://www.naplesnews.com/story/news/environment/2018/04/16/red-tide-could-persist-into-midweek-collier-officials-say/522031002/
	'Not out of the woods yet': Red tide could persist into midweek, Collier officials say

	A patchy red tide algae bloom that stretches from Collier to Charlotte counties continues to make its presence felt on some Collier and Lee beaches, and officials say conditions could persist into midweek. 

	Collier County officials continue to receive reports about fish kills and of beachgoers experiencing respiratory issues, especially at Barefoot Beach and South Marco Beach, said Rhonda Watkins, a senior operations analyst with Collier County Pollution Control, on Monday.

	Barefoot Beach has seen the most reports of dead fish, although it is not necessarily clear which are old and which are new, Watkins said. Researchers have encountered red tide conditions at all Collier beaches, with higher concentrations in Lee, she said. 

	Forecasts show that winds and currents could carry medium levels of concentration, which is the threshold where fish kills can occur, into northern Collier before Thursday, Watkins said.

	"We're not out of the woods yet," she said.

	...Winds can carry red tide to shore, so people with respiratory problems should avoid the beach, Watkins said.

	...Fish kills were reported in Lee at Big Carlos Pass, Bonita Beach, Bonita Dog Beach, Gasparilla Island, Lighthouse Beach, Little Estero Island Beach, Lovers Key, near New Pass, Newton Park and Sanibel Island, according to the FWC report.

	In Collier, dead fish were reported at Barefoot Beach, Central Avenue beach, Big Hickory Pass, Doctors Pass, Via Miramar Beach, near Delnor-Wiggins Pass State Park, Residents Beach and Vanderbilt Beach. 

	..."We had a lot of dead catfish and sardines," said Robert Steiger, the park's manager.

	He estimated that about 1,000 fish washed ashore.

	"Worst I've seen it," Steiger said. "It was a lot, a lot of fish."

	Park crews worked hard to clear the beaches before a front moving through over the weekend took care of the rest, he said.

	"It blew everything out," Steiger said, "nature's way of cleaning things up."


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	No place to spend the weekend with the kids. To Oppenheimer and many others, including not a few scientists, the greenhouse world is no vacationland. It is downright terrifying.

	The adaptationist panel's report was even too much for one of its own members. Jane Lubchenco, an ecologist from Oregon State University, issued a strong dissent, stating "I disagree with the report's implicit message, that we can adapt with little or no problem."

	Yet according to the majority of the panel, Lubchenco is overreacting, or rather reacting in the absence of good data. The results of a warming "will be no more severe, and adapting to them will be no more difficult, than for the range of climates already on Earth and no more difficult than for other changes humanity faces."


https://books.google.com/books?id=RD4rAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA146&lpg=PA146
	So far as we can reason from the assumed gradual changes in climate, their impacts will be no more severe, and adapting to them no more difficult, than for the range of climates already on earth and no more difficult than for other changes humanity faces. However, because we cannot rule out major changes in ocean currents, atmospheric circulations, or other natural or social surprises, we need to be alert to any substantial probability or signs of such changes that would require responses not considered in our report.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	...The farmers will probably do all right, they say. Increased levels of carbon dioxide in the atmosphere makes plants happy, at least in the laboratory. Things grow well in warm weather.

	..."We did not forsee that people would dumbly suffer and so we did not use a 'dumb-people scenario.' We assumed people would adapt. We assumed people don't have feet of clay," said panel chairman Paul Waggoner, an agronomist and meterologist at the Connecticut Agricultural Experiment Station in New Haven.


https://www.reuters.com/article/us-un-climate-usa-paris/u-s-submits-formal-notice-of-withdrawal-from-paris-climate-pact-idUSKBN1AK2FM
	AUGUST 4, 2017 / 5:25 PM / 8 MONTHS AGO
	U.S. submits formal notice of withdrawal from Paris climate pact


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1991/09/22/so-what-if-its-getting-hot/65e40697-1e92-4c8d-a9b6-9735e7bb9c98/
	The adaptationists, heavily influenced by such economists on the panel as William Nordhaus of Yale University, stress that the human activities that generate most of the national income will be little affected by gradual climate change.

	Some 97 percent of U.S. income, Nordhaus notes, is generated by the industrial and energy sectors; only 3 percent by agriculture and forest products. 

	...Based on pollen records, scientists believe a temperate forest can move at a rate of about 100 kilometers per century. Not fast enough, the panel says, to match the speed at which warming is expected to come. But to give the natural world a chance, the scientists suggest that natural "corridors" be preserved to allow for movement of seeds and animals.

	...There will be costs. There will be winners and losers. But the crops will grow. Industry will continue. Humans will adjust and adapt.

	As for the warblers, elms and menhaden, the adaptationists say they'll have to fend for themselves.

	William Booth writes about science and medicine for The Post's national desk.



why is everything he writes like he hates the human race?


satanic misanthrope preparing the world for an alien invasion or not, one thing is sure: Booth is an idiot